Washington statutes.
RCW 38.60.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certification board" means the voluntary public safety telecommunicator certification board.

(2) "Public safety answering point" includes primary public safety answering points that receive 911 calls directly from the public and secondary public safety answering points that receive 911 calls only on a transfer or relay basis from the primary public safety answering point.

(3) "Public safety telecommunicator" means a first responder working in a primary public safety answering point, regardless of title, who has successfully completed the training, certification, or recertification standards established in the state of Washington. This includes an employee of the state, a local public agency, or an independent governmental agency whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit, or dispatch 911 emergency and nonemergency calls for law enforcement, fire, emergency medical, and other public safety services by telephone, radio, or other communication devices and includes an individual who promoted from this position and supervises individuals who perform these functions.

(4) "State-approved training program" means a public safety telecommunicator certified training program approved by the certification board to meet the requirements of a state-approved public safety telecommunicator training, certification, and recertification standards. For community colleges, vocational-technical institutes, skill centers, and secondary schools as described in chapter 28B.50 RCW, public safety telecommunicator certified training programs shall be approved by the certification board in cooperation with the board for community and technical colleges or the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2022 c 286 s 2.]